District of Columbia statutes.
29-405.06

Waiver of notice.

(a)

A member may waive any notice required by this chapter, the articles of incorporation, or the bylaws before or after the date and time stated in the notice or of the meeting or action. The waiver shall be in the form of a record, be signed by the member entitled to the notice, and be delivered to the membership corporation for inclusion in the minutes or filing with the corporate records.

(b)

The attendance of a member at a meeting waives objection to:

(1)

Lack of notice or defective notice of the meeting, unless the member at the beginning of the meeting objects to holding the meeting or transacting at the meeting;

(2)

Consideration of a particular matter at the meeting that is not within the purpose described in the meeting notice, unless the member objects at the meeting to considering the matter.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720